src-fst-root.lexc.md
* `+Foc/gi `
* *pulkki:* `pulk+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi`

###  Kasutust (sagedust jm) iseloomustavad märgendid / Usage-related tags

* `+Emph `: long inflectional forms of personal pronouns *mina*, *sina*, *tema*, *meie*, *teie*, *nemad*
* *temale:* `tema+Pron+Sg+All+Emph`

### Paralleelvormide erinevat kasutussagedust iseloomustavad / Usage info for parallel forms (either correct according to the norm, or incorrect)

* `+Usage/Rare `: norm, but rare 
* *puusid:* `puu+N+Pl+Par+Usage/Rare`

* `+Usage/Hyp `:  norm, but so rare that norm is probaly wrong 
* *tiivasse:* `tiib+N+Sg+Ill+Usage/Hyp`

* `+Usage/NotNorm `:  not norm, but sometimes used 
* *pöidlates:* `pöial+N+Pl+Ine+Usage/NotNorm`

* `+Usage/CommonNotNorm `:  not norm, and used more than norm 
* *kööment:* `köömen+N+Sg+Par+Usage/CommonNotNorm`

Oletatav analüüs / Guessed analysis
* `+Guess `: guessed analysis

### Tuletus / Derivation

### Eesliited on harvad, aga ikkagi ... / Prefixes are seldom used, but still...

* `+Pref `
* *taasriigistama:* `taas+Pref#riigistama+V+Pers+Sup+Ill`
* *reinvesteerima:* `re+Pref#investeerima+V+Pers+Sup+Ill`

### Järelliited / Suffixes

V --> N

* `+Der/mine `
* *jahumine:* `jahuma+V+Der/mine+N+Sg+Nom`

* `+Der/ja `
* *jahuja:* `jahuma+V+Der/ja+N+Sg+Nom`

* `+Der/nu `
* *elanu:* `elama+V+Der/nu+N+Sg+Nom`

* `+Der/mus `
* *küllastumus:* `küllastuma+V+Der/mus+N+Sg+Nom`

* `+Der/ng `
* *devalveering:* `devalveerima+V+Der/ng+N+Sg+Nom`

* `+Der/is `
* *arveldis:* `arveldama+V+Der/is+N+Sg+Nom`

V --> A

* `+Der/v `
* *jahuv:* `jahuma+V+Der/v+A+Sg+Nom`

* `+Der/tav `
* *öeldav:* `ütlema+V+Der/tav+A+Sg+Nom`

* `+Der/nud `
* *elanud:* `elama+V+Der/nud+A+Sg+Nom`

* `+Der/mata `
* *elamata:* `elama+V+Der/mata+A`

* `+Der/matu `
* *segamatu:* `segama+V+Der/matu+A+Sg+Nom`

* `+Der/tamatu `
* *mõeldamatu:* `mõtlema+V+Der/tamatu+A+Sg+Nom`

* `+Der/tu `
* *elatu:* `elama+V+Der/tu+A+Sg+Nom`

* `+Der/tud `
* *elatud:* `elama+V+Der/tud+A`

N --> A

* `+Der/lik `
* *kotkalik:* `kotkas+N+Der/lik+A+Sg+Nom`

* `+Der/line `
* *põõsaline:* `põõsas+N+Der/line+A+Sg+Nom`
* *onomastiline:* `onomastika+N+Der/line+A+Sg+Nom`
* *apooriline:* `apooria+N+Der/line+A+Sg+Nom`

* `+Der/ne `

A --> Adv

* `+Der/lt `
* *roosalt:* `roosa+A+Der/lt+Adv`

* `+Der/sti `
* *valusasti:* `valus+A+Der/sti+Adv`

* `+Der/ini `
* *paremini:* `parem+A+Comp+Der/ini+Adv`

A --> A

* `+Der/m `
* *valusam:* `valus+A+Der/m+A+Comp+Sg+Nom`

* `+Der/im `
* *valusaim:* `valus+A+Der/im+A+Superl+Sg+Nom`

N --> N

* `+Der/nna `
* *õmblejanna:* `õmbleja+N+Der/nna+N+Sg+Nom`

* `+Der/kond `
* *vaatajaskond:* `vaatama+V+Der/ja+N+Der/kond+N+Sg+Nom`

* `+Der/ist `
* *kapitalist:* `kapitalism+N+Der/ist+N+Sg+Nom`

A --> N, V --> N

* `+Der/us `
* *porisus:* `porine+A+Der/us+N+Sg+Nom`
* *õpetus:* `õpetama+V+Der/us+N+Sg+Nom`

N --> Adv

* `+Der/ti `
* *lauati:* `laud+N+Der/ti+Adv`

* `+Der/lane `:  helveetslane:Helveetsia+N+Prop+Der/lane+N+Sg+Nom
* *firenzelane:* `Firenze+N+Prop+Der/lane+N+Sg+Nom`
* *helveetslane:* `Helveetsia+N+Prop+Der/lane+N+Sg+Nom`

N --> N, A --> A

* `+Dim/ke `:  diminutive 
* *põõsake:* `põõsas+N+Dim/ke+Sg+Nom`

* `+Der/minus `:  shortening stem 
* *vaatamis-:* `vaatamine+N+Der/minus`
* *astraal-:* `astraalne+A+Der/minus`

Num --> N

* `+Der/kas `
* *kolmekas:* `kolm+Num+Card+Der/kas+N+Sg+Nom`

### Muud / Other tags
Copied from Sami root.lexc

* `+Use/Circ `: for arabic and roman numerals; 
* `+Use/PMatch `: for tokenisation with pmatch
* `+Use/-PMatch `: for tokenisation with pmatch

* `+ABBR `: Lühend / Abbreviation
* +Symbol = independent symbols in the text stream, like £, €, ©
* `+ACR `: Suurtähtlühend / Acronym
* `+CLB `: Osalause piir (punkt, koma) / Clause border (full stop, comma..)
* `+PUNCT `: Kirjavahemärk / Punctuation
* `+LEFT `: Kirjavahemärgi asetus / Punctuation orientation
* `+RIGHT `: Kirjavahemärgi asetus / Punctuation orientation
* `+Err/Orth `: Ortograafiaviga (genereeritud failide sümbol)/ orthography error

## Flag diacritics
Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
given the proper use of these flags.
|  @U.Cap.Obl@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
|  @U.Cap.Opt@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.

These are used for limiting the number of components in a compound word
(the compound transducer is cyclic, but in reality there is a limit to the length of words)
|  @D.Part@ | No part of a compound should have been encountered yet
|  @P.Part.One@ | Indicate that this could be the first part of a compound
|  @R.Part.One@ | Require that the first part has been encountered; if a lemma has it, it means that the lemma cannot be part2 or part3 of a compound
|  @D.Part.One@ | Require that the first part has NOT been encountered 
|  @P.Part.Two@ | Indicate that this could be the second part of a compound
|  @R.Part.Two@ | Require that the second part has been encountered
|  @P.Part.Three@ | Indicate that this could be the third part of a compound
|  @P.Part.Bad@ | Indicate that this cannot be a part of a compound
|  @R.Part.Bad@ | Require that the first part has been encountered; if a lemma has it, it means that the lemma cannot be part2  

POS is used for filtering derivations and compounds
|  @R.POS.NumCardCompound@ | compound numeral (viis+sada - five hundred)

Case is used for filtering derivations and compounds

Remember there has been some derivation from A or N; for filtering compounds
derivation from V is called paradigmatic and does not result in Der; just a new POS... 

Remember the stem type; for filtering compounds 

A special condition that is used for filtering derivations and compounds

Tokeniser 

Guesser

### Symbols that need to be escaped on the lower side (towards twolc):
Sami GT convention 

* »
* «
* > (escaped with square brackets, to avoid collision with > as morpheme boundary)
* < (escaped with square brackets, to avoid collision with < as morpheme boundary)

* '  7 is the real apostrophe ?? 

Legitimate strings that are not words: numbers, acronyms, ...

## Lexicons  

* `LEXICON Root ` is the starting point of everything

For modelling compounds, the simplex word fst is concatenated with itself.
For this, Kleene star operation is used, i.e. fst is concatenated zero to any number of times.
For the lookup process, this creates a possibility of infinitely many passes through the fst, 
thus allowing infinitely long words.
For limiting and controlling the passes, flag diacritics are used.
Lookup process remembers which paths it has taken, and counts the passes. 
For remembering, it sets up flags on the path:
1. Flag the first 3 passes through the simplex fst (thus forbidding any more passes)
(the lexicon contains conventionalised compounds, thus the max number of compound components 
is larger than three; however, no Estonian word with more than five components has been found yet) 
2. In every pass, flag the POS and inflection, to be used in the following pass
Different paths may correspond to the same surface string, 
e.g. mootoriõlilik = (mootori+õli)+lik and (mootori)+(õli+lik)

Lexicon-based passes

strictly simplex word; cannot be a part of a compound
a simplex word, or the first part of a compound

* `  @D.Part@@P.Part.Two@@P.NeedPart.Three@@P.POS.Num@ CardinalNumbersInCompBeg ;   ` 5-autone etc

Guesser
assumes that there is only one pass, and that only the final part is important
(out-of-vocabulary simplex words are treated elsewhere)

--- end guesser

lexicon-based

strictly simplex words; cannot be a part of a compound

* `  Adpositions ;              `
* `  Conjunctions ;             `
* `  NoninflectingVerbs ;       `
* `  NoninflectingAdjectiveVa ; `
* `  NonCompoundingAdverbs ;   `

* `  Abbreviations ;              `
* `  CardinalNumbersSingle ;      `
* `  OrdinalNumbers ;             `
* `  Punctuation ;                `
* `  Symbols     ;                `
* `  SymbolStrings     ;          `   .ee .com -ending strings

* `LEXICON First     ` a simplex word or the first part of a compound 

* `LEXICON FirstOpenClass     ` a simplex word or the first part of a compound 
* `  @P.POS.A@ Adjectives ;              `
* `  @P.POS.A@ NoninflectingAdjectives ; `
* `  @P.POS.AComp@ ComparativeAdjectives ;   `
* `  @P.POS.AComp@ SuperlativeAdjectives ;   `  ! Superl = Comp in compounding
* `  @P.POS.Adv@ CompoundingAdverbs ;                 `
* `  @P.POS.N@ Nouns ;                   `
* `  @P.POS.NProp@@U.Cap.Obl@ ProperNouns ; `  ! always uppercase
* `  @P.POS.NProp@@U.Cap.Opt@ ProperNouns ; `  ! downcased for derivations
* `  @P.POS.IntNum@ IntegerNumerals ;                `
* `  @P.POS.NonIntNum@ NonIntegerNumerals ;                `
* `  @P.POS.NumOrd@ OrdinalNumerals ;                `
* `  @P.POS.V@ Verbs ;                   `
* `  @P.POS.GA@@P.Case.Gen@ GenitiveAttributes ;      `
* `  @P.POS.Pref@ Prefixes ;                `

* `LEXICON FirstClosedClass     ` a simplex word or the first part of a compound 
* `  @P.POS.Pron@ Pronouns ;                `

* `LEXICON FirstWordLike                      ` a word-like string that may (or must) be the first part of a compound
* `  @P.POS.Interj@ Interjections ;           `
* `  @P.POS.ACR@ Acronyms ;                   `
* `  @P.POS.ACRMinus@@P.NeedPart.Two@ Acrominus ;          `

* `LEXICON Latter ` the latter part of a compound

* `  @P.POS.A@@C.Der@@C.Stem@ Adjectives ;              `

* `  @P.POS.A@@C.Der@@C.Stem@ Adjectives_ne ;              `
järguline	järk+N+Der/line+A  redellik redel+N+Der/lik+A     NOT -autone

* `  @P.POS.A@@C.Der@@C.Stem@ Adjectives_v ;              `

* `  @P.POS.A@@C.Der@@C.Stem@ PlainAdjectives ;              `

* `  @P.POS.AComp@@C.Der@@C.Stem@ ComparativeAdjectives ;              `
* `  @P.POS.AComp@@C.Der@@C.Stem@ SuperlativeAdjectives ;              `

* `  @P.Case.Gen@ LatterVerb ;                   `

* `  @P.POS.V@@C.Der@@P.Stem.Verb@ Verbs ;                   `

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-est-x-utee/blob/main/src/fst/root.lexc)</small>

---
